Utah statutes.
58-37f-702.   Reporting prescribed controlled substance poisoning or overdose to a practitioner.

(1)  Beginning on July 1, 2012, if the division receives a report from a general acute hospital under Section 26-21-26, regarding admission to a general acute hospital for poisoning or overdose involving a prescribed controlled substance, the division shall, within three business days after the day on which the report is received:

(a)  attempt to identify, through the database, each practitioner who may have prescribed the controlled substance to the patient; and

(b)  provide each practitioner identified under Subsection (1)(a) with:

(i)  a copy of the report provided by the general acute hospital under Section 26-21-26; and

(ii)  the information obtained from the database that led the division to determine that the practitioner receiving the information may have prescribed the controlled substance to the person named in the report.

(2)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the information provided under Subsection (1)(b) is provided for the purpose of assisting the practitioner in:

(a)  discussing with the patient issues relating to the poisoning or overdose;

(b)  advising the patient of measures that may be taken to avoid a future poisoning or overdose; and

(c)  making decisions regarding future prescriptions written for the patient.

(3)  Beginning on July 1, 2010, the division shall, in accordance with Section 63J-1-504, increase the licensing fee described in Subsection 58-37-6(1)(b) to pay the startup and ongoing costs of the division for complying with the requirements of this section.

